District of Columbia statutes.
9-705

Penalty.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any rule or regulation prescribed under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not more than 6 months, or both.

History

June 29, 1940, ch. 444, § 5
as added May 15, 1947, 61 Stat. 94, ch. 62

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1105.
1973 Ed., § 7-1305.